Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2620.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin METRO EMERALD ASH BORER RESPONSE GRANTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the Metropolitan Council for grants to local units of government for emerald ash borer response efforts, including but not limited to predesign and design of wood waste facilities, temporary wood waste storage facilities, transporting wood waste, and tree shredding and other tree disposal activities. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin COMMUNITY TREE-PLANTING GRANTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $5,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources for community tree-planting grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 84.705. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end